translate/lexd/adv.lexd
биттā:никогда
биӡуқ:часто_с_а_неподвижно
биӡуқ:часто_с_а_торчком
бо-ҳам:вместе
боам:совместно
бозгах̌т:опять
бойад:нужно
бом:вместе
бом:совместно
бор-субā:ранней_весной
боро:много_раз
бору̊надах:пасмурно
бору̊ндах:пасмурно
бор:хоть
борҳо:много_раз
бу̊қаст:с_треском
бузғумчи:торопливо
бузғумчи:усиленно
булфӣсаθ:неожиданно
булфӣс:неожиданно
бун-ӡилуқ:на_корточках
бун-ӡилӯқ:на_корточках
бунҷойаки:на_одном_месте
бунҷойаки:постоянно
бунҷоки:на_одном_месте
бунҷоки:постоянно
буор-субā:ранней_весной
буорчев:каждую_весну
буруш-май-май:торопливо
бут-бут:с_бульканьем
буқаθ:все
бӣдарди:лучше
бӣдиди:лучше
бӣди:лучше
бӣр:вниз
бӯлак-бӯлак:по_частям
бӯҷӣн:много
ваҷ:снаружи
вегā:вечером
вегā:вчера
вегаки:вечером
вегаки:после_полудня
веганӣнҷ-аθ:вечером
вегаҷев:по_вечерам
вегӣнҷ-аθ:вечером
вегӣнҷаθ:с_вечера
вегӣнҷ:с_вечера
векорā:без_дела
вироwор:побратски
виродwор:побратски
во:вновь
во:все_же
во:еще
во:снова
гā-гā:иногда
гā-го:иногда
гā-гӣр:иногда
гā-йигу̊н:иногда
гā-ҷо:коегде
гā:иногда
гā:иногда_иногда
галнêɣ̌ак-ɣ̌алнêɣ̌ак:колеблясь
гандā:плохо
гандā:сильно
гандаҷин:плохо
гарδӯнак:вокруг
гармовā-аθ:быстро
гармовā-йаθ:быстро
гат-чи-гат:с_трудом
гилнêɣ̌ак-гилнêɣ̌ак:колеблясь
гирд-аθ:вокруг
гирдо-гирд:вокруг
го-гā:иногда
го-го:иногда
го-йигу̊н:иногда
го:иногда
го:иногда_иногда
гойи:иногда
гойи:никогда
гу̊л-аθ:тихопретихо
гур-гур:друг_за_другом
гураст:быстро
гургумбā:друг_за_другом
дāфатан:немедленно
даδ:после
даδ:потом
дако-дако:постепенно
дако:пока
дако:постепенно
далбāқ-аθ:зря
далбāқ:зря
далӣл:возможно
дам-бар-дам:непрестанно
дам-бар-дам:один_за_другим
дамбас:неожиданно
дамбаст:неожиданно
дамбат:неожиданно
даппаθ:внезапно
даппаθ:с_шумом
даппаст:внезапно
даппаст:с_шумом
даппат:внезапно
даппат:с_шумом
дар-аwо-θ:на_лету
дар-аwо-аθ:на_лету
дар-аwо-йаθ:на_лету
дар-аwо:в_воздух
дар-ақêқат:на_самом_деле
дар-ба-хайол:на_уме
дар-ба-хайор:на_уме
дар-бало:в_беде
дар-гард:всегда
дар-дам:почти
дар-сāм:в_страхе
дар-сироқ:в_поисках
дараwаθ:тотчас
дар:далеко
дармомо:напрасно
дароз-дастā:с_длинной_ручкой
дароз:долго
дарозрāнг:долго
дарраw:тотчас
дастак:саженками
дастхоли:с_пустыми_руками
дасхоли:с_пустыми_руками
дағалу̊нā:грубо
деwу̊наwор:подобно_сумасшедшему
дер-рāнг:поздновато
дераки:долгое_время
дер:долго
дер:медленно
дер:поздно
ди-ти:над_этим
ди-ти:так
ди-тӣр:над_этим
ди-тӣр:так
диборā-га:вовсю
диборā-гад:вовсю
диборā-гад:еще
диборā-га:еще
диборā-ги:вовсю
диборā-гид:вовсю
диборā-гид:еще
диборā-ги:еще
диборā:вовсю
диборā:еще
дига:больше
дига:в_остальном
дигаен:больше
дигаен:в_остальном
дигаен:совсем
дигар-га:больше
дигар-гад:больше
дигар-гад:еще
дигар-га:еще
дигар-ги:больше
дигар-гид:больше
дигар-гид:еще
дигар-ги:еще
дигар:больше
дигар:в_остальном
дигарен:больше
дигарен:в_остальном
дигарен:совсем
дигарйор:больше
дигарйор:в_остальном
дигарйор:совсем
дигар:совсем
дига:совсем
дил-фирҷā:спокойно
дироз:долго
диру̊ғ-аθ:напрасно
дируст:правильно
дирух̌т:грубо
дирӯйā:по
дирӯйаги:с_той_стороны
дирӯй:по
дирӯғ-аθ:напрасно
дирӯғаθ:напрасно
дис-аθ:в_самом_деле
дис-аθ:просто_так
дис-гад:так_же
дис-га:так_же
дис-гид:так_же
дис-ги:так_же
дисак-аθ:просто_так
дисик-аθ:просто_так
дис:так
доим:всегда
доими:постоянно
дойим-аθ:всегда
дойим:всегда
дойими:постоянно
друх̌т:грубо
дуwум:вовторых
ду̊мбас:неожиданно
ду̊мбаст:неожиданно
ду̊мбат:неожиданно
ду̊н-ду̊ндик:понемногу
ду̊н-ду̊ндик:столечко
ду̊нā:ни_капли
ду̊на-бар:совсем
ду̊нд-аθ:даже
ду̊нд-ард:к_тому_времени
ду̊нд-ду̊ндик:понемногу
ду̊нд-ду̊ндик:столечко
ду̊нд-ирд:к_тому_времени
ду̊ндазā:коекак
ду̊ндик-гад:еще_чутьчуть
ду̊ндик-га:еще_чутьчуть
ду̊ндик-гид:еще_чутьчуть
ду̊ндик-ги:еще_чутьчуть
ду̊ндик:вот_столечко
ду̊ндикик:немножко
ду̊ндикик:чутьчуть
ду̊ндик:немножко
ду̊ндик:чутьчуть
ду̊нд:лишь_бы
ду̊нд:настолько
ду̊нд:столько
ду̊нд:только
ду̊нд:хорошо
ду̊н:лишь_бы
ду̊н:настолько
ду̊н:только
ду̊н:хорошо
дугур-аθ:согнувшись
дугур-дугур:согнувшись_в_три_погибели
дуйум:вовторых
дури:будто_бы
дуруст:правильно
дух̌wор:трудно
дух̌ману̊нā:враждебно
душwор:трудно
дуқ-дуқ:быстробыстро
дӯн-дӯндик:понемногу
дӯн-дӯндик:столечко
дӯнд-дӯндик:понемногу
дӯнд-дӯндик:столечко
дӯндик-гид:еще_чутьчуть
дӯндик-ги:еще_чутьчуть
дӯндикик:немножко
дӯндикик:чутьчуть
дӯндик:немножко
дӯндик:чутьчуть
дӯнд:немножко
дӯс-аθ:самую_малость
дӯс-дӯсик:понемногу
дӯс-дӯс:понемногу
дӯс-мӯсик:понемногу
дӯс-мӯс:понемногу
дӯс-пӯсик:понемногу
дӯс-пӯс:понемногу
дӯсгунā-га:еще_немножко
дӯсгунā:немного
дӯсди:еще_меньше
дӯсик-га:еще
дӯсик-ги:еще
дӯсикик:совсем_немножко
дӯсик:совсем_немножко
дӯс:немного
еwу̊ни:поскотски
етимол:возможно
еҷак:на_ногах
жêх̌т-а-жêх̌т:бегом
жêх̌т-о-жêх̌т:бегом
жибирақаст:во_всю_прыть
жибирақаст:очень_сильно
жидақаст:с_треском
жидақат:с_треском
жӣр-гāл:на_камень
залал:вредно
замисту̊н:зимой
заму̊н-га:вдруг
заму̊н-гад:вдруг
заму̊н-гад:иногда
заму̊н-гад:через_миг
заму̊н-га:иногда
заму̊н-га:через_миг
заму̊н-ги:вдруг
заму̊н-гид:вдруг
заму̊н-гид:иногда
заму̊н-гид:через_миг
заму̊н-ги:иногда
заму̊н-ги:через_миг
заму̊н-кāф:моментально
заму̊ни-га:вдруг
заму̊ни-га:иногда
заму̊ни-га:через_миг
заму̊но-га:вдруг
заму̊но-гад:вдруг
заму̊но-гад:иногда
заму̊но-гад:через_миг
заму̊но-га:иногда
заму̊но-га:через_миг
заму̊но-ги:вдруг
заму̊но-гид:вдруг
заму̊но-гид:иногда
заму̊но-гид:через_миг
заму̊но-ги:иногда
заму̊но-ги:через_миг
замӯн-га:вдруг
замӯн-гад:вдруг
замӯн-гад:иногда
замӯн-гад:через_миг
замӯн-га:иногда
замӯн-га:через_миг
замӯни-га:вдруг
замӯни-га:иногда
замӯни-га:через_миг
зарwӣнак:путано
зарар:вредно
зеб:нужно
зи-ғайри:только
зибо:после
зибо:сзади
зийод:чрезмерно
зийот:много
зийот:чрезмерно
зимисту̊н-ҷев:зимами
зимисту̊н:зимой
зиндаwор:живо
зинор:никогда
зинҳор:никогда
зич:плотно
зич:тесно
зойиро:вероятно
зойро:вероятно
золиму̊нā:жестоко
зорδну̊нҷ:по_сердцу
зорδнӣнҷ:по_сердцу
зорδӣнҷ:по_сердцу
зор:очень
зу̊н-гарδӯн:до_колена
зӯди:быстрота
и-гад:еще
и-га:еще
и-гид:еще
и-ги:еще
иболаҷиник-аθ:жалостно
иболҷиник-аθ:жалостно
игу̊ни:иногда
игу̊ни:примерно
ик-аманд:там
ик-амандӣр:там
ик-амард:там
ик-амва:вдоль_того
ик-амвад:вдоль_того
ик-амец:местоименное_наречие_дальн_ст_до_того
ик-амтӣр:туда
ик-дис:так
ик-ду̊нд:лишь_бы
ик-ду̊нд:настолько
ик-ду̊нд:только
ик-ду̊нд:хорошо
ик-ду̊н:лишь_бы
ик-ду̊н:настолько
ик-ду̊н:только
ик-ду̊н:хорошо
ик-еданд:в
ик-еданд:тут
ик-едандӣр:в
ик-едандӣр:тут
ик-едард:здесь
ик-едард:повсюду
ик-едец:до_того
ик-едец:до_того_места
ик-ерад:здесь
ик-ерад:повсюду
ик-ера:здесь
ик-ера:повсюду
ик-тāм:именно
ик-тāм:только_тогда
ик-уминдир:там
ик-уминд:там
инсу̊нwор:почеловечески
иншаолло:бог_даст
иншаоло:бог_даст
иншаҳолло:бог_даст
иншаҳоло:бог_даст
иншодло:бог_даст
иншонлло:бог_даст
ич-мāл:никогда
ич-пух̌т:никогда
йагу̊ни:иногда
йагу̊н:иногда
йагу̊ни:примерно
йагу̊н:примерно
йак-δустāк:одной_рукой
йак-бор-аθ:одновременно
йак-бор-гад:еще_другой_раз
йак-бор-га:еще_другой_раз
йак-бор-гид:еще_другой_раз
йак-бор-ги:еще_другой_раз
йак-бор:впервые
йак-бори:по_разу
йак-бор:один_раз
йак-бор:однажды
йак-дам:немного
йак-дастā:с_одной_ручкой
йак-дигар:друг_друга
йак-дилу̊нā:единодушно
йак-йак:постепенно
йак-лухт:целиком
йак-масоф:одинаково
йак-поδāк:одной_ногой
йак-рез:в_один_прием
йак-рез:одновременно
йак-рухāθ:без_передышки
йак-рухā:без_передышки
йак-сар:одновременно
йак-сикир:всегда
йак-сунā:одинаково
йак-тарафā:односторонне
йак-тарвā:односторонне
йак-цемāк:краем_глаза
йак-цемāк:одним_глазом
йак-чӣз:немножко
йак-ҷоθ:вместе
йак-ҷо:вместе
йак-ҷоги:вместе
йак-ҷоги:совместно
йак-ҷойā:вместе
йак-ҷойаθ:вместе
йак-ҷойаги:совместно
йак-ҷойи:вместе
йака-тозаθ:продолжительно
йака-тоз:продолжительно
йакандар:всегда
йакандоз:постепенно
йакборā-аθ:один_раз
йакборāθ:одновременно
йакборā:один_раз
йакборā:одновременно
йаки:вдруг
йаккум:вопервых
йако-дукā:иногда
йакум:вопервых
йак–чанд:несколько
йаманд:там
йамандӣр:там
йамард:там
йамард:туда
йамва:вдоль_того
йамвад:вдоль_того
йамец:местоименное_наречие_дальн_ст_до_того
йамрад:там
йамра:там
йамтир:там
йамтир:туда
йамти:туда
йамтӣр:туда
йах̌а-йах̌ā:с_трудом
йақӣнанд:непременно
йақӣн:доподлинно
йақӣн:достоверно
йева:вдоль_того
йевад:вдоль_того
йеданд:в
йеданд:тут
йедандӣр:в
йедандӣр:здесь
йедандӣр:тут
йедард:здесь
йедард:повсюду
йедард:сюда
йед:в
йедец:до_того
йедец:до_того_места
йединд:в
йединд:тут
йединдӣр:в
йединдӣр:тут
йедирд:здесь
йедирд:повсюду
йед:сокр_от_йеданд
йед:тут
йели:с_добрыми_намерениями
йенди:в
йенди:тут
йерад:здесь
йерад:повсюду
йера:здесь
йера:повсюду
йерид:здесь
йерид:повсюду
йери:здесь
йери:повсюду
йет-аθ:открыто
йетимол:возможно
йети:туда_того
йетӣр:туда_того
йи-гад:еще
йи-га:еще
йи-гид:еще
йи-гӣ:еще
йи-ноw:много
йи-рāнгаθ:как
йи-рāнг:как
йи-ру̊ф:немножко
йи-чанд:несколько
йи-ҷойаθ:куданибудь
йи-ҷойаθ:нигде
йи-ҷо:куданибудь
йи-ҷо:нигде
йиwу-йиwа:вон
йиwу̊-йиwа:вон_там
йиwу̊-йиwу:вон_там
йиwу̊-йуwа:вон_там
йиwу̊-йуwу:вон_там
йиwу:вон
йигу̊н-йигу̊н:иногда
йигу̊ни:иногда
йигу̊н:иногда
йигу̊ни:примерно
йигу̊н:примерно
йик-тāм:только_тогда
йирā:как_раз
йич-мāл:никогда
йуwу̊-йуwа:вон_там
йуwу̊-йуwу:вон_там
йу̊ва:вдоль
йу̊вад:вдоль
йу̊д-ат-йамард:там_и_сям
йу̊д-ат-йам:там_и_сям
йу̊д-ат-йумард:там_и_сям
йу̊д-ат-йумирд:там_и_сям
йу̊д-ат-йум:там_и_сям
йу̊д-йамак:там_и_сям
йу̊д-йамард:там_и_сям
йу̊д-йам:там_и_сям
йу̊д-йумак:там_и_сям
йу̊д-йумард:там_и_сям
йу̊д-йумирд:там_и_сям
йу̊д-йум:там_и_сям
йу̊данд:в_это_время
йу̊данд:здесь
йу̊дандӣр:в_это_время
йу̊дандӣр:здесь
йу̊дард:здесь
йу̊дард:сюда
йу̊д:в_это_время
йу̊дец:до_этого
йу̊д:здесь
йу̊динд:в_это_время
йу̊динд:здесь
йу̊диндӣр:в_это_время
йу̊диндӣр:здесь
йу̊дирд:здесь
йу̊нди:в_это_время
йу̊нди:здесь
йу̊ндӣр:в_это_время
йу̊ндӣр:здесь
йу̊рад:здесь
йу̊ра:здесь
йу̊ри:здесь
йу̊ти:сюда
йу̊тӣр:сюда
йумандӣр:там
йумва:вдоль_того
йумвад:вдоль_того
йумец:местоименное_наречие_дальн_ст_до_того
йуминди:там
йуминд:там
йуминдӣр:там
йумирд:там
йумрид:там
йумри:там
йумти:туда
йумтӣр:туда
йӣwи:поодному
йӣwйу̊н:изредка
йӣwйу̊ник:изредка
йӣwйу̊ник:коегде
йӣwйу̊н:коегде
йӣзаθ:грустно
йӯн-тар-йӯн:подробно
к-а-редрид:туда_вниз
к-а-редри:туда_вниз
к-азамāҷанд:вон_у_того
к-азамāҷард:вон_тому_там
к-азамāҷинд:вон_у_того
к-азамāҷирд:вон_тому_там
к-азамāҷ:оттуда
к-азамāҷ:там
к-азамандӣр:оттуда
к-азамандӣр:тогда
к-азамард:оттуда
к-азаминд:оттуда
к-азаминд:тогда
к-азаминдӣр:оттуда
к-азаминдӣр:тогда
к-азамирд:оттуда
к-азам:оттуда
к-азамра:оттуда
к-азамри:оттуда
к-азам:там
к-азамти:оттуда
к-азамтов:оттуда
к-азамтӣр:оттуда
к-азедāҷанд:вот_у_того
к-азедāҷард:вот_тому
к-азедāҷинд:вот_у_того
к-азедāҷирд:вот_тому
к-азедāҷ:оттуда
к-азедāҷра:вот_тому
к-азедāҷри:вот_тому
к-азедāҷ:там
к-азеданд:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
к-азеданд:тогда
к-азедандӣр:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
к-азедандӣр:тогда
к-азедард:оттуда
к-азединд:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
к-азединд:тогда
к-азедирд:оттуда
к-азед:с_той_стороны
к-азед:там
к-азедти:оттуда
к-азедтов:оттуда
к-азедтӣр:оттуда
к-азенди:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
к-азенди:тогда
к-азенд:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
к-азенд:тогда
к-азера:оттуда
к-азери:оттуда
к-азе:с_той_стороны
к-азе:там
к-азети:оттуда
к-азетов:оттуда
к-азетӣр:оттуда
к-азу̊дāҷанд:вот_у_этого
к-азу̊дāҷард:вот_этому
к-азу̊дāҷ:здесь
к-азу̊дāҷинд:вот_у_этого
к-азу̊дāҷирд:вот_этому
к-азу̊дāҷ:отсюда
к-азу̊дāҷра:вот_этому
к-азу̊дāҷрад:вот_этому
к-азу̊дāҷри:вот_этому
к-азу̊дāҷрид:вот_этому
к-азу̊данд:отсюда
к-азу̊данд:тут
к-азу̊дандӣр:отсюда
к-азу̊дандӣр:тут
к-азу̊дард:отсюда
к-азу̊д:здесь
к-азу̊динди:отсюда
к-азу̊динди:тут
к-азу̊динд:отсюда
к-азу̊динд:тут
к-азу̊дирд:отсюда
к-азу̊д:отсюда
к-азу̊дти:отсюда
к-азу̊дтов:отсюда
к-азу̊дтӣр:отсюда
к-азу̊нди:отсюда
к-азу̊нди:тут
к-азу̊нд:отсюда
к-азу̊нд:тут
к-азу̊рад:отсюда
к-азу̊ра:отсюда
к-азу̊ри:отсюда
к-азу̊ти:отсюда
к-азу̊тов:отсюда
к-азу̊тӣр:отсюда
к-азумāҷанд:вон_у_того
к-азумāҷард:вон_тому_там
к-азумāҷ:оттуда
к-азумāҷ:там
к-азуманди:оттуда
к-азуманди:тогда
к-азуманд:оттуда
к-азуманд:тогда
к-азумандӣр:оттуда
к-азумандӣр:тогда
к-азумард:оттуда
к-азум:оттуда
к-азумра:оттуда
к-азум:там
к-азумти:оттуда
к-азумтов:оттуда
к-азумтӣр:оттуда
к-аманд:там
к-амандӣр:там
к-амард:там
к-амва:вдоль_того
к-амвад:вдоль_того
к-амец:местоименное_наречие_дальн_ст_до_того
к-амрад:там
к-амра:там
к-амтӣр:туда
к-арамāҷанд:у_тех
к-арамāҷард:тем
к-арамāҷинд:у_тех
к-арамāҷирд:тем
